North Carolina, session 2025, HB592.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read as follows:
"Article 19C.
"DEHP Hazard Management.
"§ 130A-453.33. Legislative finding.
The General Assembly finds all of the following:
(1) DEHP and other ortho-phthalates are toxic chemicals used primarily to
produce flexibility in plastics, mainly polyvinyl chloride (PVC).
(2) DEHP is the most common plasticizer used in medical devices, including
intravenous solution containers, which are also known as IV bags, and
intravenous tubing.
(3) Over the course of its shelf life, DEHP leaches from IV bags and tubing made
from DEHP into the solutions being held in the medical devices.
(4) DEHP is classified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency as
an endocrine-disrupting compound since it can:
a. Interfere with the hormonal system in humans and animals.
b. Mimic or block the actions of hormones, leading to adverse effects on
reproductive health, development, and metabolism.
(5) DEHP exposure has been associated with adverse effects on reproductive
organs and fertility. DEHP can also disrupt normal reproductive development,
reduce sperm quality, and affect hormone levels in both males and females.
(6) DEHP is metabolized in the liver and can accumulate in the body over time.
Prolonged exposure to high levels of DEHP has been shown to cause liver and
kidney damage in animal studies.
(7) Inhalation or ingestion of DEHP can cause respiratory irritation and allergic
reactions in some individuals, particularly those with preexisting respiratory
conditions or sensitivities.
(8) Studies have suggested a potential link between DEHP exposure and certain
types of cancer, including breast, liver, lung, and testicular cancer.
(9) The United States Environmental Protection Agency has determined that
DEHP is a probable human carcinogen.
*H592-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(10) The leaching of DEHP from medical devices at varying concentrations has
been linked to multidrug resistance in breast cancer cells, inhibiting the
effectiveness of breast cancer drugs. This phenomenon has been observed at
both high and low concentrations of DEHP, highlighting the potential impact
of DEHP leaching on cancer treatment outcomes.
(11) Exposure to DEHP has been linked to multidrug resistance in triple-negative
breast cancer cells, inhibiting the apoptosis mechanism induced by breast
cancer drugs, such as tamoxifen, and increasing cell proliferation.
(12) DEHP has been suggested to serve as a mitogenic factor for estrogen
receptor-positive breast cancer cells, potentially making them multidrug
resistant.
"§ 130A-453.34. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) DEHP. – Di(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate.
(2) Health care practitioner. – An individual who is authorized to practice some
component of the healing arts by a license, permit, certificate, or registration
issued by a State licensing agency or board.
(3) Intentionally added DEHP. – DEHP that a manufacturer has intentionally
added to a product and that has a functional or technical effect on the product.
(4) Intravenous solution container. – A container used to house medicine, fluid,
or nutrition therapy that is intravenously delivered to a patient in a hospital,
outpatient facility, or other health care facility.
(5) Intravenous tubing. – Tubing used to intravenously administer fluids,
medication, or nutrients directly to an adult, child, or infant.
(6) Ortho-phthalate. – A class of chemicals that are esters of ortho-phthalic acid,
including DEHP or any of the following:
a. Benzyl butyl phthalate (BBP).
b. Dibutyl phthalate (DBP).
c. Dicyclohexyl phthalate (DCHP).
d. Diethyl phthalate (DEP).
e. Diisobutyl phthalate (DIBP).
f. Diisodecyl phthalate (DIDP).
g. Diisononyl phthalate (DINP).
h. Di-n-hexyl phthalate (DnHP).
i. Di-n-octyl phthalate (DNOP).
j. Di-n-pentyl phthalate (DnPP).
k. Diisoheptyl phthalate (DIHP).
(7) Unintentionally added DEHP. – DEHP in an intravenous solution container
or intravenous tubing product that is not used for functional or technical effect
on the product.
"§ 130A-453.35. Prohibitions.
(a) Intravenous Solution Containers. – Beginning January 1, 2030, a person or entity shall
not manufacture, sell, or distribute into commerce in the State of North Carolina intravenous
solution containers made with intentionally added DEHP.
(b) Intravenous Tubing. – Beginning January 1, 2035, a person or entity shall not
manufacture, sell, or distribute into commerce in the State of North Carolina intravenous tubing
made with intentionally added DEHP.
(c) Replacement. – A person may not replace DEHP, pursuant to this Article, with
another ortho-phthalate in a new or revised medical device.
Page 2 House Bill 592-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) Maximum Quantity. – An intravenous solution container or intravenous tubing
product shall not have unintentionally added DEHP present at a quantity at or above 0.1 percent
weight per weight (w/w).
(e) Exemptions. – The following items, as described in Title 21 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, are exempt from these provisions:
(1) Human blood collection and storage bags.
(2) Apheresis and cell therapy blood kits and bags, including integral tubing.
(f) Delayed Compliance. – A person or entity, due to pending United States Food and
Drug Administration approval for the DEHP-free intravenous solution container or due to the
manufacturer not having adequate equipment to manufacture the DEHP-free intravenous solution
container, shall meet the requirement in subsection (a) of this section by January 1, 2032, if all
of the following conditions are met:
(1) The person or entity notified its North Carolina customers, no later than
October 1, 2025, that it has commenced development of the DEHP-free
intravenous solution container to meet the requirements of this section.
(2) The person or entity provides notice to its customers and posts to its official
internet website, no later than January 1, 2028, that it will not meet the
deadline imposed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section."
SECTION 2. G.S. 130A-22(b3) reads as rewritten:
"(b3) The Secretary may impose an administrative penalty on a person who violates Article
19A or 19B Article 19A, 19B, or 19C of this Chapter or any rules adopted pursuant to Article
19A or 19B Article 19A, 19B, or 19C of this Chapter. Each day of a continuing violation is a
separate violation. The penalty shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the
violation continues for Article 19A of this Chapter. The penalty shall not exceed five thousand
dollars ($5,000) for each day the violation continues for Article 19B of this Chapter. The penalty
shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the violation continues for Article
19C of this Chapter. The penalty authorized by this section does not apply to a person who is not
required to be certified under Article 19A or 19B."
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 592-Second Edition Page 3